Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 336.211 is amended to read:
336.211. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Education provider” means:
(A) An entity that offers a program that is recognized  as an Oregon prekindergarten program
under ORS 329.170 to 329.200.
(B) A school district board.
(b) “Eye examination” means an eye examination that:
(A) Is conducted by a person licensed by the Oregon Board of Optometry  under ORS 683.010 to
683.340 or a person licensed  by the Oregon Medical Board under ORS chapter 677 and trained in
eye surgery and eye disease; and
(B) Involves any diagnosis of the eye and any measurement or  assistance of the powers or range
of vision of the eye.
(c) “Vision screening” means an eye screening test to  identify potential vision health problems
that is conducted by:
(A) A person licensed by the Oregon Board of Optometry under ORS 683.010 to 683.340;
(B) A person licensed by the Oregon Medical Board under ORS chapter  677 and trained in eye
surgery and eye disease;
(C) A  health care practitioner acting in accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of
Education; or
(D) A school nurse, an employee of an education provider or  a person or nonprofit entity
designated by the Department of Education to provide  vision screening to students who is acting in
accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each  education provider shall require
a student who is  seven years of age or younger and who is beginning an educational program with
the education provider for the first time to submit certification that the student received:
(A) A vision screening or an eye examination; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 187 (SB 187-A) Page 1
(B) Any further examinations or necessary treatments of the eye  or assistance of the powers or
range of vision of the eye.
(b) The certification required by this subsection must be provided no later than 120 days  after
the student begins the educational program.
(3) A student is not  required to submit certification as required under subsection (2) of this
section if the student provides a statement from the parent or guardian of the student that:
(a) The student submitted certification to a prior education provider; or
(b) The vision screening or eye examination is contrary to the religious beliefs  of the student
or the parent or guardian of the student.
(4) Each education provider shall:
(a) Ensure that the requirements  of this section are met. Failure by a student to meet the re-
quirements of this section may not result in a  program’s or school’s prohibiting the student from
attending the program or school, but may result in withholding report cards or similar actions.
(b) File in the student’s vision health record any certifications  and any results of a vision
screening or an eye examination known by the education provider.
(c) Provide the parent or guardian of  each student with information about the vision screenings
and eye examinations, and information about further examinations or necessary treatments.
(5)(a) Upon application of an education provider that provides students with  vision
screenings, the Department of Education shall reimburse  the education provider for any
necessary expenses incurred by the education provider in  the provision of the vision
screenings, including any expenses related to contracting with a person or nonprofit entity.
(b) An education provider may  receive reimbursement under this subsection for the
provision of a vision screening to any student of the education provider,  regardless of
whether the student has complied with subsection (2) or (3) of this section. Nothing in this
paragraph removes the requirement  that a student must comply with subsection (2) or (3)
of this section.
(c) Reimbursements made under this subsection:
(A) May not exceed $3.20 per vision screening per student per school year.
(B) Must be paid from  the Vision Health Account established under section 3 of this 2017
Act.
(C) May not exceed amounts available in the Vision Health Account.
[(5)] (6)(a) The State Board of Education, in consultation  with the Oregon Health Policy Board,
shall adopt by rule any standards for the implementation of this section.
(b) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules that:
(A) Prescribe the process by which a person or nonprofit entity is designated by the De-
partment of Education to provide vision screenings; and
(B) Establish the process for providing reimbursements under subsection (5) of  this sec-
tion, including the prioritization of education providers to receive  a reimbursement if the
total amount available for reimbursements exceeds the  total amount requested for re-
imbursements.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 683.030 is amended to read:
683.030. ORS 683.010 to 683.340 may not be construed:
(1) To prevent any person  duly licensed to practice medicine and surgery from treating or fitting
glasses to the human eye;
(2) To prohibit the sale of complete ready-to-wear  eye glasses as merchandise from a permanent
place of business in good faith and not in evasion of ORS  683.010 to 683.340 by any person not
purporting to be competent to examine and prescribe for the human eye;
(3) To prohibit vision or eye care practices by persons  working under the direct supervision of
an optometrist authorized to practice in this state; or
(4) To prohibit vision screening by:
(a) Employees of a school or an education provider as defined in ORS 336.211;
Enrolled Senate Bill 187 (SB 187-A) Page 2
(b) Persons or nonprofit entities  designated by the Department of Education to provide vision
screening to students for the purpose of ORS 336.211; or
(c) Employees of the Department of Transportation.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Vision Health Account is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by  the account shall be credited to the
account.
(2) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Department of  Education
to make reimbursements to education  providers for expenses incurred for the provision of
vision screenings, as described in ORS 336.211 (5).
(3) The department, on behalf of the State of Oregon, may solicit and  accept gifts, grants
and donations from public and private sources for the provision of vision screenings. Moneys
received under this subsection shall be deposited into the account.
(4) From the  moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly to the account each
biennium, the department may retain no more than a total of 10 percent  of the moneys for
administrative expenses incurred by the department in making reimbursements to education
providers.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $1,000,000 to be deposited in the Vision Health Account estab-
lished by section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5516), for  operations for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for pay-
ment of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  Edu-
cation is increased  by $81,659 for the purpose of making reimbursements as provided under
ORS 336.211 (5).
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5516), for other grants for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of grants-in-aid,  program costs and purchased services from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or  received by the Department of Education for programs is increased by $918,341
for the purpose of making reimbursements as provided under ORS 336.211 (5).
SECTION 7.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 187 (SB 187-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate July 1, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 187 (SB 187-A) Page 4